Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1281.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the U Nonimmigrant Visa Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Certification form." The United States Citizenship and Immigration Services Federal form I-918, Supplement B, U Nonimmigrant Status Certification, including any successor form, which:(1) is required under 8 U.S.C. § 1184(p)(1) (relating to admission of nonimmigrants) and 8 CFR 214.14(c)(2)(i) 123456789101112131415161718 (relating to alien victims of certain qualifying criminal activity); and(2) confirms that a qualifying criminal activity has occurred and the victim of a qualifying criminal activity was helpful, is helpful or is likely to be helpful to a certifying agency in the detection, investigation or prosecution of the qualifying criminal activity."Certifying agency." Any of the following:(1) The Pennsylvania State Police.(2) A local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction.(3) A judicial office.(4) A prosecutor's office.(5) An agency that has criminal investigative jurisdiction in the agency's respective areas of expertise."Certifying official." The head of a certifying agency or an individual who has been specifically designated by the head of a certifying agency to provide certification forms on behalf of the certifying agency."Immigration representative accredited by the United States Department of Justice." An individual who meets all of the following criteria:(1) Is accredited by the United States Department of Justice to represent individuals before the Board of Immigration Appeals, a Federal immigration proceeding or the United States Department of Homeland Security.(2) Works for a specific nonprofit, religious, charitable, social service or similar organization that has been recognized by the United States Department of Justice to represent the individuals specified under paragraph (1).(3) Has accreditation under paragraph (1) in good 20250HB1281PN1453 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 standing."Judicial office." An office of any of the following:(1) A judge of the court of common pleas.(2) A judge of the Commonwealth Court.(3) A judge of the Superior Court.(4) A justice of the Supreme Court.(5) A magisterial district judge.(6) A judge of the Pittsburgh Magistrates Court.(7) A judge of the Philadelphia Municipal Court.(8) A master appointed by a judge of a court of common pleas."Legal representative." Any of the following who represents the interests of a petitioner:(1) An immigration representative accredited by the United States Department of Justice.(2) A licensed attorney.(3) A parent or legal guardian in the case of a child or an incapacitated or incompetent individual.(4) A domestic violence counselor/advocate as defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions).(5) A sexual assault counselor as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 5945.1 (relating to confidential communications with sexual assault counselors).(6) Any other third party appointed by the petitioner."Petitioner." An individual who submits a certification form petition under this act."Prosecutor's office." An office of any of the following:(1) The Attorney General.(2) A deputy attorney general.(3) A district attorney.20250HB1281PN1453 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) An assistant district attorney."Qualifying criminal activity." As defined in 8 CFR 214.14(a)(9)."U visa." The U nonimmigrant visa available to an individual who meets all of the following criteria:(1) Is a victim of a qualifying criminal activity that occurred in the United States or was otherwise in violation of Federal or State law.(2) Suffered substantial physical or mental abuse as a result of the qualifying criminal activity.(3) Was helpful, is helpful or is likely to be helpful to a certifying agency in the detection, investigation or prosecution of the qualifying criminal activity."Victim of a qualifying criminal activity." As defined in 8 CFR 214.14(a)(14).Section 3. Duties of certifying officials.(a) Duties.--A certifying official shall have the following duties:(1) Respond to a certification form petition that is received by the certifying agency.(2) In collaboration with a subject matter expert on certification forms and violence against immigrants, develop a protocol for a certification form petition and make the protocol publicly accessible to a victim of a qualifying criminal activity, the legal representative of the victim of a qualifying criminal activity or other person upon request. The certifying official shall post the protocol developed under this paragraph on a publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Maintain a written record or an electronic record of 20250HB1281PN1453 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a certification form petition and the response to the petition by the certifying agency.(4) Develop or implement the certifying agency's language access protocol for a non-English-speaking victim of a qualifying criminal activity.(5) Upon receipt of the certification form by a petitioner or the petitioner's legal representative, authorize the certification form when the certifying official determines that the petitioner:(i) was a victim of a qualifying criminal activity;(ii) possesses information about the qualifying criminal activity; and(iii) was helpful, is helpful or is likely to be helpful to the certifying agency in the detection, investigation or prosecution of the qualifying criminal activity.(b) Consideration.--For the purpose of determining whether a petitioner meets the requirements for a certification form under subsection (a)(5), the following shall apply:(1) A certifying official shall not consider any of the following:(i) The period of time between when the petitioner was a victim of a qualifying criminal activity and when the petitioner submitted the petition for a certification form.(ii) Whether there is an active investigation of the qualifying criminal activity.(iii) Whether a formal statement of charges has been filed regarding the qualifying criminal activity.(iv) Whether there was a prosecution or conviction 20250HB1281PN1453 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the qualifying criminal activity.(2) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a petitioner meets the requirement under subsection (a)(5)(i) if the petitioner has cooperated or provided information or other assistance reasonably requested by a certifying agency. During the initial outreach with a petitioner to seek information or other assistance under this paragraph, the certifying agency shall make a reasonable effort to communicate with the petitioner in the petitioner's native language. The inability of the certifying agency to communicate with a petitioner due to the petitioner's native language, or the petitioner's lack of response during the initial outreach due to the communication being conducted solely in English, shall not be considered a refusal or failure to provide information or other assistance under this paragraph.(c) Authorization.--Upon determining that a petitioner meets the requirements under subsection (a)(5), a certifying official shall authorize the certification form by completing and signing the certification form. If applicable, the certifying official shall include all of the following information in the certification form:(1) The details regarding the nature of the qualifying criminal activity being investigated or prosecuted.(2) A description of the helpfulness or likely helpfulness of the victim of the qualifying criminal activity to the detection, investigation or prosecution of the qualifying criminal activity.(d) Withdrawal.--A certifying agency may only withdraw the certification form if the victim of the qualifying criminal 20250HB1281PN1453 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 activity refuses to provide information or other assistance reasonably requested by a certifying agency.Section 4. Processing of certification form petitions.(a) Process.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), no later than 30 days after receipt of a certification form petition, a certifying agency shall process the petition. A petitioner may request an expedited time period for the certifying agency to process a certification form petition, which shall be processed no later than 14 days after receipt of the petition, if the petitioner or the legal representative of the petitioner under subsection (b) affirmatively establishes all of the following:(i) The petitioner is in a Federal removal proceeding or has a final order of removal.(ii) The petitioner provides documentation that the petitioner or the petitioner's child or sibling would become ineligible for benefits under 8 U.S.C. § 1184(o) and (p) (relating to admission of nonimmigrants) by virtue of the petitioner or the petitioner's child becoming 21 years of age or the petitioner's sibling becoming 18 years of age.(iii) The petitioner has a deadline to respond to a request for additional evidence from the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.(2) A certifying official may extend the time period by which a certification form petition must be processed under paragraph (1) only upon written agreement with the petitioner or the legal representative of the petitioner under subsection (b).20250HB1281PN1453 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Legal representatives.--A legal representative of a petitioner may submit a certification form petition to a certifying agency if the petitioner:(1) was under 16 years of age on the date that a qualifying criminal activity first occurred and the legal representative has been helpful to the certifying agency in the detection, investigation or prosecution of the qualifying criminal activity; or(2) is incapacitated or incompetent and the legal representative has been helpful to the certifying agency in the detection, investigation or prosecution of the qualifying criminal activity.(c) Reports.--(1) Upon a certifying official completing and signing the certification form under section 3(c), the certifying agency shall return, without a fee or charge, the signed certification form to the victim of the qualifying criminal activity and release each relevant page of a report relating to the qualifying criminal activity, unless already provided by a law enforcement agency under paragraph (2). The certifying agency shall have the discretion on when to release each relevant page of a report relating to the qualifying criminal activity.(2) Within 14 days of a request by a victim of a qualifying criminal activity or a legal representative of the victim of a qualifying criminal activity, a law enforcement agency with whom the victim of a qualifying criminal activity filed a report relating to the qualifying criminal activity shall provide a copy of the report to the victim of a qualifying criminal activity or the legal representative of 20250HB1281PN1453 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the victim of a qualifying criminal activity.Section 5. Confidentiality of immigration status.A certifying official or certifying agency may not disclose the immigration status of a victim of a qualifying criminal activity or a petitioner, except to comply with Federal law or as authorized by the victim of a qualifying criminal activity or petitioner.Section 6. Denial of certification forms.(a) Notice of denial.--If a certifying official denies the authorization of a certification form under section 3(c), the certifying official shall provide a written notice to the petitioner explaining how the available evidence does not support a finding that the petitioner meets the requirements for a certification form under section 3(a)(5). Except in the case of an expedited time period to process a certification form petition under section 4(a)(1), the certifying official shall provide the written notice under this subsection to the petitioner within 30 days of receipt of the petition. The certifying official shall state the reasons for the denial in the written notice under this subsection, including any of the following reasons:(1) Lack of jurisdiction over the certification form request due to the certifying agency not having been involved in the detection, investigation or prosecution of the qualifying criminal activity. If the denial is for the reason specified under this paragraph, the certifying official shall refer the petitioner to the appropriate certifying official within 30 days of providing the written notice under this subsection. If the certifying official fails to refer the petitioner to the appropriate certifying official within the 20250HB1281PN1453 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 30-day period specified under this paragraph, the certifying official shall authorize the certification form in accordance with section 3(c) or provide a subsequent written notice to the petitioner stating another reason for the denial.(2) The petitioner was not a victim of a qualifying criminal activity.(3) Lack of helpfulness, including documented instances of failure or refusal to comply with reasonable requests for information or other assistance.(b) Review.--Upon receiving written notice under subsection (a), the petitioner or the legal representative of the petitioner may provide supplemental information to the certifying agency and request that the petition be reviewed by the certifying agency.(c) Consideration.--In reviewing a petition under subsection (b), a certifying agency may consider only the factors specified under subsection (a) when deciding whether to authorize a certification form.(d) Notice.--If, after authorizing a certification form, a certifying official or certifying agency determines that the recipient of the certification form was not the victim of a qualifying criminal activity or the recipient unreasonably refuses to assist in the detection, investigation or prosecution of the qualifying criminal activity, the certifying official or certifying agency may provide written notice of the determination to the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services.Section 7. Training program for certifying agencies and certifying officials.In collaboration with subject matter experts on certification 20250HB1281PN1453 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 forms and violence against immigrants, a certifying agency shall provide an annual training program to certifying officials for the purposes of effectuating this act. The training program shall be compulsory and include all of the following subjects:(1) The impacts of qualifying criminal activities on victims of a qualifying criminal activity and their safety.(2) Compliance with certification form protocols.(3) The roles of certifying officials.(4) Collaborations with victim service providers and immigrant advocacy providers.Section 8. Construction.(a) U visas.--The authorization of a certification form under this act shall not be construed as sufficient evidence that an applicant for a U visa has met all eligibility requirements for a U visa or guarantee the applicant will receive Federal immigration relief.(b) Limitation.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit the manner in which a certifying officer or certifying agency describes whether a victim of a qualifying criminal activity has cooperated or has been helpful to the certifying official or the certifying agency during a Federal immigration proceeding regarding a U visa.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1281PN1453 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324